Utah statutes.
15-7-10.   Investment of public funds in registered obligations of public
entities of other states.
Obligations issued by public entities under the laws of another state, the
District of Columbia, or by territories or possessions of the United States,
which are in registered form, whether or not represented by an instrument, and
which, except for their form, satisfy the requirements with regard to security
for deposits of money of public agencies prescribed pursuant to the law of
Utah, are deemed to satisfy all such requirements even though they are in
registered form if a security interest in such obligations is perfected on
behalf of the public agency whose money is deposited.
